Utah statutes.
70A-9a-401.   Alienability of debtor's rights.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2) and Sections 70A-9a-406, 70A-9a-407, 70A-9a-408, and 70A-9a-409, whether a debtor's rights in collateral may be voluntarily or involuntarily transferred is governed by law other than this chapter.

(2)  An agreement between the debtor and secured party which prohibits a transfer of the debtor's rights in collateral or makes the transfer a default does not prevent the transfer from taking effect.

